dictionaries/isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ev Y 62
SFX Ev ti l .
SFX Ev ti la .
SFX Ev ti lo .
SFX Ev ti li .
SFX Ev ti nu .
SFX Ev ti nem .
SFX Ev ti neš .
SFX Ev ti ne .
SFX Ev ti nemo .
SFX Ev ti nete .
SFX Ev ti nut .
SFX Ev ti h .
SFX Ev ti še .
SFX Ev ti hmo .
SFX Ev ti ste .
SFX Ev ti hu .
SFX Ev ti ni .
SFX Ev ti nimo .
SFX Ev ti nite .
SFX Ev ti nuči .
SFX Ev ti nučego .
SFX Ev ti nučemu .
SFX Ev ti nučim .
SFX Ev ti nučem .
SFX Ev ti nučih .
SFX Ev ti nučimi .
SFX Ev ti nuča .
SFX Ev ti nuču .
SFX Ev ti nučej .
SFX Ev ti nučeju .
SFX Ev ti nuče .
SFX Ev ti nemy .
SFX Ev ti nemogo .
SFX Ev ti nemomu .
SFX Ev ti nemym .
SFX Ev ti nemom .
SFX Ev ti nemo .
SFX Ev ti nema .
SFX Ev ti nemu .
SFX Ev ti nemoj .
SFX Ev ti nemoju .
SFX Ev ti nemi .
SFX Ev ti neme .
SFX Ev ti nemyh .
SFX Ev ti nemym .
SFX Ev ti nemymi .
SFX Ev ti vši .
SFX Ev ti všego .
SFX Ev ti všemu .
SFX Ev ti všim .
SFX Ev ti všem .
SFX Ev ti vših .
SFX Ev ti všimi .
SFX Ev ti vša .
SFX Ev ti všu .
SFX Ev ti všej .
SFX Ev ti všeju .
SFX Ev ti vše .
SFX Ev i y .
SFX Ev i a .
SFX Ev i o .
SFX Ev i je .

SFX Ew Y 28
SFX Ew 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ew y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Ew y a/xPxE .
SFX Ew y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Ew y u/xPxE .
SFX Ew y oj/xPxE .
SFX Ew y om/xPxE .
SFX Ew y omu/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ew y oju/xPxE .
SFX Ew y i/xPxE .
SFX Ew y e/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ew mnogy bolši/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšego/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšemu/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšim/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšem/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolše/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolša/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšu/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšej/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšeju/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolših/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšim/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolšimi/zz .
SFX Ew mnogy bolje/zz .

SFX Ex Y 9
SFX Ex 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ex i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ex i eri/xPxE .
SFX Ex i ere/xPxE .
SFX Ex i erij/xPxE .
SFX Ex i erah/xPxE .
SFX Ex i eram/xPxE .
SFX Ex i erju/xPxE .
SFX Ex i erami/xPxE .

SFX Ey Y 28
SFX Ey 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ey y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Ey y a/xPxE .
SFX Ey y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Ey y u/xPxE .
SFX Ey y oj/xPxE .
SFX Ey y om/xPxE .
SFX Ey y omu/xPxE .
SFX Ey 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ey y oju/xPxE .
SFX Ey y i/xPxE .
SFX Ey y e/xPxE .
SFX Ey 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ey 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ey gky žši/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšego/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšemu/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšim/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšem/zz .
SFX Ey gky žše/zz .
SFX Ey gky žša/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšu/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšej/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšeju/zz .
SFX Ey gky žših/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšim/zz .
SFX Ey gky žšimi/zz .
SFX Ey ky še/xPxE .

SFX Ez Y 71
SFX Ez sti dl .
SFX Ez sti dla .
SFX Ez sti dlo .
SFX Ez sti dli .
SFX Ez sti m .
SFX Ez sti š .
SFX Ez sti 0 .
SFX Ez sti mo .
SFX Ez sti te .
SFX Ez sti dut .
SFX Ez sti deh .
SFX Ez sti deše .
SFX Ez sti dehmo .
SFX Ez sti deste .
SFX Ez sti dehu .
SFX Ez sti d .
SFX Ez sti dmo .
SFX Ez sti dte .
SFX Ez sti duči .
SFX Ez sti dučego .
SFX Ez sti dučemu .
SFX Ez sti dučim .
SFX Ez sti dučem .
SFX Ez sti dučih .
SFX Ez sti dučimi .
SFX Ez sti duča .
SFX Ez sti duču .
SFX Ez sti dučej .
SFX Ez sti dučeju .
SFX Ez sti duče .
SFX Ez sti domy .
SFX Ez sti domogo .
SFX Ez sti domomu .
SFX Ez sti domym .
SFX Ez sti domom .
SFX Ez sti domo .
SFX Ez sti doma .
SFX Ez sti domu .
SFX Ez sti domoj .
SFX Ez sti domoju .
SFX Ez sti domi .
SFX Ez sti dome .
SFX Ez sti domyh .
SFX Ez sti domym .
SFX Ez sti domymi .
SFX Ez sti domo .
SFX Ez sti dši .
SFX Ez sti dša .
SFX Ez sti dše .
SFX Ez sti deny .
SFX Ez sti denogo .
SFX Ez sti denomu .
SFX Ez sti denym .
SFX Ez sti denom .
SFX Ez sti deni .
SFX Ez sti dene .
SFX Ez sti denyh .
SFX Ez sti denymi .
SFX Ez sti dena .
SFX Ez sti denu .
SFX Ez sti denoj .
SFX Ez sti denoju .
SFX Ez sti deno .
SFX Ez sti denje/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denja/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denju/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denjem/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denij/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denjam/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denjami/xPxE .
SFX Ez sti denjah/xPxE .

SFX FA Y 12
SFX FA koli ekoli .
SFX FA koli akoli .
SFX FA koli egokoli .
SFX FA koli ukoli .
SFX FA koli ejkoli .
SFX FA koli emkoli .
SFX FA koli emukoli .
SFX FA koli imkoli .
SFX FA koli ejukoli .
SFX FA koli ikoli .
SFX FA koli ihkoli .
SFX FA koli imikoli .

SFX FB Y 4
SFX FB tokoli egokoli .
SFX FB tokoli emkoli .
SFX FB tokoli emukoli .
SFX FB tokoli imkoli .

SFX FC Y 13
SFX FC ykoli okoli .
SFX FC ykoli akoli .
SFX FC ykoli ogokoli .
SFX FC ykoli ukoli .
SFX FC ykoli ojkoli .
SFX FC ykoli omkoli .
SFX FC ykoli omukoli .
SFX FC koli mkoli .
SFX FC ykoli ojukoli .
SFX FC ykoli ikoli .
SFX FC ykoli ekoli .
SFX FC koli hkoli .
SFX FC koli mikoli .

SFX FD Y 3
SFX FD o a .
SFX FD o u .
SFX FD 0 m .

SFX FE Y 3
SFX FE e a .
SFX FE e u .
SFX FE 0 m .

SFX FF Y 12
SFX FF jže že .
SFX FF ojže aže .
SFX FF jže gože .
SFX FF ojže uže .
SFX FF jže mže .
SFX FF jže muže .
SFX FF ojže ymže .
SFX FF že uže .
SFX FF ojže iže .
SFX FF ojže eže .
SFX FF ojže yhže .
SFX FF ojže ymiže .

SFX FG Y 11
SFX FG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FG u o/xPxBxO .
SFX FG 0 i/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 a/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 u/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 am/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 om/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX FG 0 e/xPxE .

SFX FH Y 6
SFX FH 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FH a o/xPxBxO .
SFX FH ka ok/xPxE .
SFX FH 0 h/xPxE .
SFX FH 0 m/xPxE .
SFX FH 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX FI Y 10
SFX FI 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX FI v ov/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 i/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 e/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 am/xPxE .
SFX FI v ovju/xPxE .
SFX FI 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX FJ Y 10
SFX FJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FJ a y/xPxE .
SFX FJ a u/xPxE .
SFX FJ a 0 .
SFX FJ a ě/xPxE .
SFX FJ 0 h/xPxE .
SFX FJ 0 m/xPxE .
SFX FJ a oju/xPxE .
SFX FJ 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX FJ a o/xPxE .

SFX FK Y 4
SFX FK tokoli ogokoli .
SFX FK tokoli omkoli .
SFX FK tokoli omukoli .
SFX FK tokoli ymkoli .

SFX FL Y 9
SFX FL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FL a o/xPxBxO .
SFX FL a e/xPxE .
SFX FL a o/xPxE .
SFX FL a oj/xPxE .
SFX FL a yh/xPxE .
SFX FL a ym/xPxE .
SFX FL a oju/xPxE .
SFX FL a ymi/xPxE .

SFX FM Y 27
SFX FM ti ju .
SFX FM ti m .
SFX FM ti ješ .
SFX FM ti š .
SFX FM ti je .
SFX FM ti 0 .
SFX FM ti jemo .
SFX FM ti mo .
SFX FM ti jete .
SFX FM i e .
SFX FM ti jut .
SFX FM ti h .
SFX FM ti še .
SFX FM ti hmo .
SFX FM ti ste .
SFX FM ti hu .
SFX FM ti j .
SFX FM ti jmo .
SFX FM ti jte .
SFX FM ti nje/xPxE .
SFX FM ti nja/xPxE .
SFX FM ti nju/xPxE .
SFX FM ti njem/xPxE .
SFX FM ti nij/xPxE .
SFX FM ti njam/xPxE .
SFX FM ti njami/xPxE .
SFX FM ti njah/xPxE .

SFX FN Y 68
SFX FN ti l .
SFX FN ti la .
SFX FN ti lo .
SFX FN ti li .
SFX FN etěti ěču .
SFX FN etěti ětim .
SFX FN etěti ětiš .
SFX FN etěti ěti .
SFX FN etěti ětimo .
SFX FN etěti ětite .
SFX FN etěti ětet .
SFX FN ti h .
SFX FN ti še .
SFX FN ti hmo .
SFX FN ti ste .
SFX FN ti hu .
SFX FN etěti ěteči .
SFX FN etěti ěteča .
SFX FN etěti ěteče .
SFX FN etěti ětimy .
SFX FN etěti ětimogo .
SFX FN etěti ětimomu .
SFX FN etěti ětimym .
SFX FN etěti ětimom .
SFX FN etěti ětimo .
SFX FN etěti ětima .
SFX FN etěti ětimu .
SFX FN etěti ětimoj .
SFX FN etěti ětimoju .
SFX FN etěti ětimi .
SFX FN etěti ětime .
SFX FN etěti ětimyh .
SFX FN etěti ětimym .
SFX FN etěti ětimymi .
SFX FN ti vši .
SFX FN ti všego .
SFX FN ti všemu .
SFX FN ti všim .
SFX FN ti všem .
SFX FN ti vših .
SFX FN ti všimi .
SFX FN ti vša .
SFX FN ti všu .
SFX FN ti všej .
SFX FN ti všeju .
SFX FN ti vše .
SFX FN ti ny .
SFX FN ti nogo .
SFX FN ti nomu .
SFX FN ti nym .
SFX FN ti nom .
SFX FN ti ni .
SFX FN ti ne .
SFX FN ti nyh .
SFX FN ti nymi .
SFX FN ti na .
SFX FN ti nu .
SFX FN ti noj .
SFX FN ti noju .
SFX FN ti no .
SFX FN ti nje/xPxE .
SFX FN ti nja/xPxE .
SFX FN ti nju/xPxE .
SFX FN ti njem/xPxE .
SFX FN ti nij/xPxE .
SFX FN ti njam/xPxE .
SFX FN ti njami/xPxE .
SFX FN ti njah/xPxE .

SFX FO Y 87
SFX FO ti l .
SFX FO ti la .
SFX FO ti lo .
SFX FO ti li .
SFX FO ti ju .
SFX FO ti m .
SFX FO ti ješ .
SFX FO ti š .
SFX FO ti je .
SFX FO ti 0 .
SFX FO ti jemo .
SFX FO ti mo .
SFX FO ti jete .
SFX FO i e .
SFX FO ti jut .
SFX FO ti h .
SFX FO ti še .
SFX FO ti hmo .
SFX FO ti ste .
SFX FO ti hu .
SFX FO ti j .
SFX FO ti jmo .
SFX FO ti jte .
SFX FO ti juči .
SFX FO ti jučego .
SFX FO ti jučemu .
SFX FO ti jučim .
SFX FO ti jučem .
SFX FO ti jučih .
SFX FO ti jučimi .
SFX FO ti jučagajuče .
SFX FO ti jučugajuče .
SFX FO ti jučejgajuče .
SFX FO ti jučejugajuče .
SFX FO ti jemy .
SFX FO ti jemogo .
SFX FO ti jemomu .
SFX FO ti jemym .
SFX FO ti jemom .
SFX FO ti jemo .
SFX FO ti jema .
SFX FO ti jemu .
SFX FO ti jemoj .
SFX FO ti jemoju .
SFX FO ti jemi .
SFX FO ti jeme .
SFX FO ti jemyh .
SFX FO ti jemym .
SFX FO ti jemymi .
SFX FO ti jemogamy .
SFX FO ti jemogamogo .
SFX FO ti jemogamomu .
SFX FO ti jemogamym .
SFX FO ti jemogamom .
SFX FO ti jemogamo .
SFX FO ti vši .
SFX FO ti všego .
SFX FO ti všemu .
SFX FO ti všim .
SFX FO ti všem .
SFX FO ti vših .
SFX FO ti všimi .
SFX FO ti všagavše .
SFX FO ti všugavše .
SFX FO ti všejgavše .
SFX FO ti všejugavše .
SFX FO ti ny .
SFX FO ti nogo .
SFX FO ti nomu .
SFX FO ti nym .
SFX FO ti nom .
SFX FO ti ni .
SFX FO ti ne .
SFX FO ti nyh .
SFX FO ti nymi .
SFX FO ti nagano .
SFX FO ti nugano .
SFX FO ti nojgano .
SFX FO ti nojugano .
SFX FO ti nje/xPxE .
SFX FO ti nja/xPxE .
SFX FO ti nju/xPxE .
SFX FO ti njem/xPxE .
SFX FO ti nij/xPxE .
SFX FO ti njam/xPxE .
SFX FO ti njami/xPxE .
SFX FO ti njah/xPxE .

SFX FP Y 50
SFX FP ti l .
SFX FP ti la .
SFX FP ti lo .
SFX FP ti li .
SFX FP ti 0 .
SFX FP uti em .
SFX FP uti eš .
SFX FP uti e .
SFX FP uti emo .
SFX FP uti ete .
SFX FP i 0 .
SFX FP ti h .
SFX FP ti še .
SFX FP ti hmo .
SFX FP ti ste .
SFX FP ti hu .
SFX FP uti i .
SFX FP uti imo .
SFX FP uti ite .
SFX FP ti či .
SFX FP ti čagnuče .
SFX FP uti emy .
SFX FP uti emogo .
SFX FP uti emomu .
SFX FP uti emym .
SFX FP uti emom .
SFX FP uti emo .
SFX FP uti emagnemo .
SFX FP uti emugnemo .
SFX FP uti emojgnemo .
SFX FP uti emojugnemo .
SFX FP uti emignemo .
SFX FP uti emegnemo .
SFX FP uti emyhgnemo .
SFX FP uti emymgnemo .
SFX FP uti emymignemo .
SFX FP ti vši .
SFX FP ti všego .
SFX FP ti všemu .
SFX FP ti všim .
SFX FP ti všem .
SFX FP ti vših .
SFX FP ti všimi .
SFX FP ti všagnuvše .
SFX FP ti všugnuvše .
SFX FP ti všejgnuvše .
SFX FP ti všejugnuvše .
SFX FP i y .
SFX FP i agnuto .
SFX FP i je .

SFX FQ Y 6
SFX FQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FQ e o/xPxBxO .
SFX FQ e ov/xPxE .
SFX FQ e ah/xPxE .
SFX FQ e am/xPxE .
SFX FQ e ami/xPxE .

SFX FR Y 10
SFX FR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FR o o/xPxBxO .
SFX FR o e/xPxE .
SFX FR o y/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 go/xPxE .
SFX FR o yh/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 m/xPxE .
SFX FR 0 mu/xPxE .
SFX FR o ym/xPxE .
SFX FR o ymi/xPxE .

SFX FS Y 10
SFX FS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FS i o/xPxBxO .
SFX FS i e/xPxE .
SFX FS i u/xPxE .
SFX FS ki ok/xPxE .
SFX FS i ah/xPxE .
SFX FS i am/xPxE .
SFX FS i eju/xPxE .
SFX FS i ami/xPxE .
SFX FS i o/xPxE .

SFX FT Y 11
SFX FT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FT a e/xPxBxO .
SFX FT a e/xPxE .
SFX FT a u/xPxE .
SFX FT ša eš/xPxE .
SFX FT a i/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 h/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 m/xPxE .
SFX FT a eju/xPxE .
SFX FT 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX FT a o/xPxE .

SFX FU Y 4
SFX FU ěstě ohsot .
SFX FU ěstě ohstah .
SFX FU ěstě omstam .
SFX FU ěstě omastami .

SFX FV Y 10
SFX FV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FV o e/xPxBxO .
SFX FV o e/xPxE .
SFX FV o a/xPxE .
SFX FV o 0 .
SFX FV o u/xPxE .
SFX FV o ah/xPxE .
SFX FV o am/xPxE .
SFX FV o em/xPxE .
SFX FV o ami/xPxE .

SFX FW Y 7
SFX FW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 te/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 ta/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 ti/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 tu/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 tem/xPxE .
SFX FW 0 tom/xPxE .

SFX FX Y 28
SFX FX 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 o/xBxPxE .
SFX FX 0 a/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ogo/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 u/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 oj/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 om/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 omu/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ym/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 oju/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 i/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 e/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 yh/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ymi/xPxE .
SFX FX 0 ějši/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšego/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšemu/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšim/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšem/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějše/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějša/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšu/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšej/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšeju/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějših/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšim/zz .
SFX FX 0 ějšimi/zz .
SFX FX 0 ěje/zz .
